Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2101
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 77-2101 to 77-2116:

(1) Estate tax means the tax due to the state under section 77-2101.01;

(2) Generation-skipping transfer tax means the tax due to the state under section 77-2101.02;

(3) Nebraska taxable estate means the federal taxable estate, as determined under Chapter 11 of the Internal Revenue Code, minus one million dollars;

(4) Nebraska taxable transfer means the federal taxable transfer, as determined under Chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code, minus one million dollars; and

(5) Transfer tax means the estate tax and generation-skipping transfer tax.

Laws 1992, LB 1004, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 67;

Laws 2002, LB 905, § 1.